California, session 20252026, AB622.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3046 of the Penal Code is amended to read:3046. (a) An inmate imprisoned under a life sentence shall not be paroled until they have served the greater of the following:(1) A term of at least seven calendar years.(2) A term as established pursuant to any other law that establishes a minimum term or minimum period of confinement under a life sentence before eligibility for parole.(b) If two or more life sentences are ordered to run consecutively to each other pursuant to Section 669, an inmate so imprisoned shall not be paroled until they have served the term specified in subdivision (a) on each of the life sentences that are ordered to run consecutively.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), an inmate found suitable for parole pursuant to a youth offender parole hearing as described in Section 3051 or an elderly parole hearing as described in Section 3055 shall be paroled regardless of the manner in which the board set release dates pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3041, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 3041 and Sections 3041.1 and 3041.2, as applicable.(d) The Board of Parole Hearings shall, in considering a parole for an inmate, consider all statements and recommendations which that may have been submitted by the judge, district attorney, and sheriff, and any reports filed by the probation officer, pursuant to Section 1203.01, or in response to notices given under Section 3042, and recommendations of other persons interested in the granting or denying of parole. The board shall enter on its order granting or denying parole to these inmates, the fact that the statements and recommendations have been considered by it.(e) In setting the minimum term or minimum period of confinement for a person imprisoned under one or more life sentences, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall apply all applicable credits promulgated pursuant to the secretary’s authority under subdivision (b) of Section 32 of Article I of the California Constitution.